Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2418.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Appropriation; Arizona criminal justice commission; major incident division task forces A. The sum of $600,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Arizona criminal justice commission to distribute evenly to the sheriffs' offices of the original five major incident division task forces located in Cochise county, Coconino county, Navajo county, Pinal county and Yuma county. B. The $600,000 appropriated to the Arizona criminal justice commission by Laws 2025, chapter 233, section 24 for the major incident regional law enforcement task force shall be distributed evenly to the sheriffs' offices of the original five major incident division task forces located in Cochise county, Coconino county, Navajo county, Pinal county and Yuma county.